Florida, session 2026, SB1410.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 14 121.051, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 15 121.051âParticipation in the system.â 16 (2)âOPTIONAL PARTICIPATION.â 17 (c)âEmployees of public community colleges or charter 18 technical career centers sponsored by public community colleges, 19 designated in s. 1000.21(5), who are members of the Regular 20 Class of the Florida Retirement System and who comply with the 21 criteria set forth in this paragraph and s. 1012.875 may, in 22 lieu of participating in the Florida Retirement System, elect to 23 withdraw from the system altogether and participate in the State 24 Community College System Optional Retirement Program provided by 25 the employing agency under s. 1012.875. 26 1.a.âThrough June 30, 2001, the cost to the employer for 27 benefits under the optional retirement program equals the normal 28 cost portion of the employer retirement contribution which would 29 be required if the employee were a member of the pension planâs 30 Regular Class, plus the portion of the contribution rate 31 required by s. 112.363(8) which would otherwise be assigned to 32 the Retiree Health Insurance Subsidy Trust Fund. 33 b.âEffective July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2011, each 34 employer shall contribute on behalf of each member of the 35 optional program an amount equal to 10.43 percent of the 36 employeeâs gross monthly compensation. The employer shall deduct 37 an amount for the administration of the program. 38 c.âEffective July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2012, each 39 member shall contribute an amount equal to the employee 40 contribution required under s. 121.71(3). The employer shall 41 contribute on behalf of each program member an amount equal to 42 the difference between 10.43 percent of the employeeâs gross 43 monthly compensation and the employeeâs required contribution 44 based on the employeeâs gross monthly compensation. 45 d.âEffective July 1, 2012, each member shall contribute an 46 amount equal to the employee contribution required under s. 47 121.71(3). Effective July 1, 2026, the employer shall contribute 48 on behalf of each program member an amount equal to the employer 49 contribution rate established under s. 121.72 for participants 50 in the Florida Retirement System Investment Plan. Contributions 51 must be remitted to the designated providers in the same manner 52 as other retirement contributions difference between 8.15 53 percent of the employeeâs gross monthly compensation and the 54 employeeâs required contribution based on the employeeâs gross 55 monthly compensation. 56 e.âThe employer shall contribute an additional amount to 57 the Florida Retirement System Trust Fund equal to the unfunded 58 actuarial accrued liability portion of the Regular Class 59 contribution rate. 60 2.âThe decision to participate in the optional retirement 61 program is irrevocable as long as the employee holds a position 62 eligible for participation, except as provided in subparagraph 63 3. Any service creditable under the Florida Retirement System is 64 retained after the member withdraws from the system; however, 65 additional service credit in the system may not be earned while 66 a member of the optional retirement program. 67 3.âAn employee who has elected to participate in the 68 optional retirement program shall have one opportunity, at the 69 employeeâs discretion, to transfer from the optional retirement 70 program to the pension plan of the Florida Retirement System or 71 to the investment plan established under part II of this 72 chapter, subject to the terms of the applicable optional 73 retirement program contracts. 74 a.âIf the employee chooses to move to the investment plan, 75 any contributions, interest, and earnings creditable to the 76 employee under the optional retirement program are retained by 77 the employee in the optional retirement program, and the 78 applicable provisions of s. 121.4501(4) govern the election. 79 b.âIf the employee chooses to move to the pension plan of 80 the Florida Retirement System, the employee shall receive 81 service credit equal to his or her years of service under the 82 optional retirement program. 83 (I)âThe cost for such credit is the amount representing the 84 present value of the employeeâs accumulated benefit obligation 85 for the affected period of service. The cost shall be calculated 86 as if the benefit commencement occurs on the first date the 87 employee becomes eligible for unreduced benefits, using the 88 discount rate and other relevant actuarial assumptions that were 89 used to value the Florida Retirement System Pension Plan 90 liabilities in the most recent actuarial valuation. The 91 calculation must include any service already maintained under 92 the pension plan in addition to the years under the optional 93 retirement program. The present value of any service already 94 maintained must be applied as a credit to total cost resulting 95 from the calculation. The division must ensure that the transfer 96 sum is prepared using a formula and methodology certified by an 97 enrolled actuary. 98 (II)âThe employee must transfer from his or her optional 99 retirement program account and from other employee moneys as 100 necessary, a sum representing the present value of the 101 employeeâs accumulated benefit obligation immediately following 102 the time of such movement, determined assuming that attained 103 service equals the sum of service in the pension plan and 104 service in the optional retirement program. 105 4.âParticipation in the optional retirement program is 106 limited to employees who satisfy the following eligibility 107 criteria: 108 a.âThe employee is otherwise eligible for membership or 109 renewed membership in the Regular Class of the Florida 110 Retirement System, as provided in s. 121.021(11) and (12) or s. 111 121.122. 112 b.âThe employee is employed in a full-time position 113 classified in the Accounting Manual for Floridaâs College System 114 as: 115 (I)âInstructional; or 116 (II)âExecutive Management, Instructional Management, or 117 Institutional Management and the community college determines 118 that recruiting to fill a vacancy in the position is to be 119 conducted in the national or regional market, and the duties and 120 responsibilities of the position include the formulation, 121 interpretation, or implementation of policies, or the 122 performance of functions that are unique or specialized within 123 higher education and that frequently support the mission of the 124 community college. 125 c.âThe employee is employed in a position not included in 126 the Senior Management Service Class of the Florida Retirement 127 System as described in s. 121.055. 128 5.âMembers of the program are subject to the same 129 reemployment limitations, renewed membership provisions, and 130 forfeiture provisions applicable to regular members of the 131 Florida Retirement System under ss. 121.091(9), 121.122, and 132 121.091(5), respectively. A member who receives a program 133 distribution funded by employer and required employee 134 contributions is deemed to be retired from a state-administered 135 retirement system if the member is subsequently employed with an 136 employer that participates in the Florida Retirement System. 137 6.âEligible community college employees are compulsory 138 members of the Florida Retirement System until, pursuant to s. 139 1012.875, a written election to withdraw from the system and 140 participate in the optional retirement program is filed with the 141 program administrator and received by the division. 142 a.âA community college employee whose program eligibility 143 results from initial employment shall be enrolled in the 144 optional retirement program retroactive to the first day of 145 eligible employment. The employer and employee retirement 146 contributions paid through the month of the employee plan change 147 shall be transferred to the community college to the employeeâs 148 optional program account, and, effective the first day of the 149 next month, the employer shall pay the applicable contributions 150 based upon subparagraph 1. 151 b.âA community college employee whose program eligibility 152 is due to the subsequent designation of the employeeâs position 153 as one of those specified in subparagraph 4., or due to the 154 employeeâs appointment, promotion, transfer, or reclassification 155 to a position specified in subparagraph 4., must be enrolled in 156 the program on the first day of the first full calendar month 157 that such change in status becomes effective. The employer and 158 employee retirement contributions paid from the effective date 159 through the month of the employee plan change must be 160 transferred to the community college to the employeeâs optional 161 program account, and, effective the first day of the next month, 162 the employer shall pay the applicable contributions based upon 163 subparagraph 1. 164 7.âEffective July 1, 2003, through December 31, 2008, any 165 member of the optional retirement program who has service credit 166 in the pension plan of the Florida Retirement System for the 167 period between his or her first eligibility to transfer from the 168 pension plan to the optional retirement program and the actual 169 date of transfer may, during employment, transfer to the 170 optional retirement program a sum representing the present value 171 of the accumulated benefit obligation under the defined benefit 172 retirement program for the period of service credit. Upon 173 transfer, all service credit previously earned under the pension 174 plan during this period is nullified for purposes of entitlement 175 to a future benefit under the pension plan. 176 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 177 121.35, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 178 121.35âOptional retirement program for the State University 179 System.â 180 (4)âCONTRIBUTIONS.â 181 (a)1.âThrough June 30, 2001, each employer shall contribute 182 on behalf of each member of the optional retirement program an 183 amount equal to the normal cost portion of the employer 184 retirement contribution which would be required if the employee 185 were a regular member of the Florida Retirement System Pension 186 Plan, plus the portion of the contribution rate required in s. 187 112.363(8) that would otherwise be assigned to the Retiree 188 Health Insurance Subsidy Trust Fund. 189 2.âEffective July 1, 2001, through June 30, 2011, each 190 employer shall contribute on behalf of each member of the 191 optional retirement program an amount equal to 10.43 percent of 192 the employeeâs gross monthly compensation. 193 3.âEffective July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2012, each 194 member of the optional retirement program shall contribute an 195 amount equal to the employee contribution required in s. 196 121.71(3). The employer shall contribute on behalf of each such 197 member an amount equal to the difference between 10.43 percent 198 of the employeeâs gross monthly compensation and the amount 199 equal to the employeeâs required contribution based on the 200 employeeâs gross monthly compensation. 201 4.âEffective July 1, 2012, each member of the optional 202 retirement program shall contribute an amount equal to the 203 employee contribution required in s. 121.71(3). Effective July 204 1, 2026, the employer shall contribute on behalf of each such 205 member an amount equal to the employer contribution rate 206 established under s. 121.72 for participants in the Florida 207 Retirement System Investment Plan. Contributions must be 208 remitted to the designated providers in the same manner as other 209 retirement contributions difference between 8.15 percent of the 210 employeeâs gross monthly compensation and the amount equal to 211 the employeeâs required contribution based on the employeeâs 212 gross monthly compensation. 213 5.âThe payment of the contributions, including 214 contributions by the employee, shall be made by the employer to 215 the department, which shall forward the contributions to the 216 designated company or companies contracting for payment of 217 benefits for members of the program. However, such contributions 218 paid on behalf of an employee described in paragraph (3)(c) may 219 not be forwarded to a company and do not begin to accrue 220 interest until the employee has executed a contract and notified 221 the department. The department shall deduct an amount from the 222 contributions to provide for the administration of this program. 223 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.